Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [169.981] SALE OR TRANSFER OF LAW ENFORCEMENT VEHICLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "law enforcement vehicle" means a vehicle owned or leased by a state or local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A person may not sell or transfer a law enforcement vehicle to the public unless the person first removes any equipment or insignia that could mislead a reasonable person to believe that the vehicle is a law enforcement vehicle, including any: new text end new text begin (1) emergency lights; new text end new text begin (2) sirens; new text end new text begin (3) spotlights; new text end new text begin (4) amber warning lights; new text end new text begin (5) grill lights; new text end new text begin (6) emblems; or new text end new text begin (7) outlines of emblems. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements in paragraph (a) do not apply to a sale or transfer to the federal government, a state, or a political subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certificate of compliance. new text end new text begin (a) Before consummating a sale or transfer of a law enforcement vehicle that is subject to subdivision 2, paragraph (a), the vehicle owner must provide a certificate of compliance to the buyer or transferee confirming that the vehicle has had the law enforcement markings removed. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of public safety must design a standard certificate of compliance form and make the form publicly available without fee on the department's publicly accessible website using existing appropriations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin (a) A person who sells or transfers a law enforcement vehicle to the public in violation of this section is liable for: new text end new text begin (1) damages proximately caused by the use of that vehicle during the commission of a crime; and new text end new text begin (2) a civil penalty of $2,500. new text end new text begin (b) Civil penalties collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the Minnesota victims of crime account created in section 299A.708. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin A county or city attorney may bring an action to recover the civil penalty established under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Sales or transfers of law enforcement vehicles to members of the public for the purpose of collection or display are exempt from the requirements of this section if the vehicle is owned and operated solely as a collector's item and not for general transportation purposes and is registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, 1g, or 1h. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective October 1, 2026. new text end